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DTC P 1700/61 SpeedSensorNo.2CircuitMalfunction
(No.2 Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The No.2 speed sensor detects the rotation speed of the transmission output shaft and sends signals to the
Engine and ECT ECU. The Engine and ECT ECU determines the vehicle speed based on these signals.
An AC voltage is generated in the No.2 speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft rotates,
and this voltage is sent to the Engine and ECT ECU.
Thegearshift pointand lock −up timingarecontrolledby theEngineandECTECUbasedon thesignals
from this speed sensor and the throttle position sensor signal.
If the No.2 speed sensor malfunctions, the Engine and ECT ECU uses input signals from the No.1 speed
sensorasaback −upsignal.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1700/61

All conditions below are detected 500 times or more continu-
ously.
(2 trip detection logic)
(a) No signal from No.2 speed sensor is input to Engine and
ECT while 4 pulses of No.1 speed sensor signal are sent.
(b) Vehicle speed: 9 km/h (5.6 mph) or more for at least 4 se-
conds
(c) Neutral start switch: OFF (Other than P or N)

SOpenorshort inNo.2speedsensorcircuit
SNo.2speedsensor
SEngineandECTECU

HINT:
Refer to thechart for thewave frombetween terminalsSP2

+

andSP2
−

whenvehiclespeed isapprox.60km/h (37mph).
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check vehicle speed value or resistance between terminals SP2 
+ 

and SP2
− of

Engine and ECT ECU.

When using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the DLC3 cover.
(b) Connect a hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(c) St ar t t he engine and t ur n t he hand−held t est er m ain

switch ON.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.
OK:

Vehicle speed matches tester speed value.
When not using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Check resistance between terminals SP2

+ 
and SP2

− of Engine
and ECT ECU.
OK:

Resistance:560 − 680 � at20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).
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2 Check No.2 speed sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the No.2 speed sensor from the transmission.
CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of No.2

speed sensor.
(b) Check voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of No.2 speed

sensor when a magnet is put close to the front end of the
No.2 speed sensor then taken away quickly.

OK:
(a) Resistance: 560 − 680 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
(b) Voltage is generated intermittently.

HINT:
The voltage generated is extremely low.

NG Replace the No.2 speed sensor.

OK

Check and repair the harness and connector
between Engine and ECT ECU and No.2
speed sensor (See page IN−35).


